Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB456.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 189A.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person shall not operate or be in physical control of a motor vehicle anywhere in
this state:
(a) Having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more as measured by a
scientifically reliable test or tests of a sample of the person's breath or blood
taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control of a
motor vehicle;
(b) While under the influence of alcohol;
(c) While under the influence of any other substance or combination of
substances which impairs one's driving ability;
(d) While the presence of a controlled substance listed in subsection (12) of this
section is detected in the blood, as measured by a scientifically reliable test, or
tests, taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control
of a motor vehicle;
(e) While under the combined influence of alcohol and any other substance which
impairs one's driving ability; or
(f) Having an alcohol concentration of 0.02 or more as measured by a
scientifically reliable test or tests of a sample of the person's breath or blood
taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control of a
motor vehicle, if the person is under the age of twenty-one (21).
(2) With the exception of the results of the tests administered pursuant to KRS
189A.103(7):
(a) If the sample of the person's blood or breath that is used to determine the
alcohol concentration thereof was obtained more than two (2) hours after
cessation of operation or physical control of a motor vehicle, the results of the
Page 1 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
test or tests shall be inadmissible as evidence in a prosecution under
subsection (1)(a) or (f) of this section. The results of the test or tests, however,
may be admissible in a prosecution under subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this
section; or
(b) If the sample of the person's blood that is used to determine the presence of a
controlled substance was obtained more than two (2) hours after cessation of
operation or physical control of a motor vehicle, the results of the test or tests
shall be inadmissible as evidence in a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of
this section. The results of the test or tests, however, may be admissible in a
prosecution under subsection (1)(c) or (e) of this section.
(3) In any prosecution for a violation of subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this section in which
the defendant is charged with having operated or been in physical control of a
motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, the alcohol concentration in the
defendant's blood as determined at the time of making analysis of his or her blood
or breath shall give rise to the following presumptions:
(a) If there was an alcohol concentration of less than 0.04[ based upon the
definition of alcohol concentration in KRS 189A.005], it shall be presumed
that the defendant was not under the influence of alcohol; and
(b) If there was an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or greater but less than 0.08[
based upon the definition of alcohol concentration in KRS 189A.005], that
fact shall not constitute a presumption that the defendant either was or was not
under the influence of alcohol, but that fact may be considered, together with
other competent evidence, in determining the guilt or innocence of the
defendant.
The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as limiting the introduction
of any other competent evidence bearing upon the questions of whether the
defendant was under the influence of alcohol or other substances, in any
Page 2 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
prosecution for a violation of subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this section.
(4) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the fact that any person
charged with violation of subsection (1) of this section is legally entitled to
use any substance, including alcohol, shall not constitute a defense against
any charge of violation of subsection (1) of this section.
(b) A laboratory test or tests for a controlled substance shall be inadmissible as
evidence in a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of this section upon a
finding by the court that the defendant consumed the substance under a valid
prescription from a practitioner, as defined in KRS 218A.010, acting in the
course of his or her professional practice. However, a laboratory test for a
controlled substance may be admissible as evidence in a prosecution under
subsection (1)(c) or (e) of this section.
(5) Any person who violates the provisions of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of
subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) For the first offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than two
hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be
imprisoned in the county jail for not less than forty-eight (48) hours nor more
than thirty (30) days, or both. Following sentencing, the defendant may apply
to the judge for permission to enter a community labor program for not less
than forty-eight (48) hours nor more than thirty (30) days in lieu of fine or
imprisonment, or both. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in
subsection (11) of this section are present while the person was operating or in
physical control of a motor vehicle, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be four (4) days, which term shall not be suspended,
probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early
release;
(b) For the second offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than
Page 3 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
three hundred fifty dollars ($350) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500)
and shall be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than seven (7) days nor
more than six (6) months and, in addition to fine and imprisonment, may be
sentenced to community labor for not less than ten (10) days nor more than
six (6) months. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in subsection
(11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be fourteen (14) days, which term shall not be suspended,
probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early
release;
(c) For a third offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than five
hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall
be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than thirty (30) days nor more
than twelve (12) months and may, in addition to fine and imprisonment, be
sentenced to community labor for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than
twelve (12) months. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in
subsection (11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be sixty (60) days, which term shall not be suspended,
probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early
release;
(d) For a fourth or subsequent offense within a ten (10) year period, be guilty of a
Class D felony. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in subsection
(11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be two hundred forty (240) days, which term shall not be
suspended, probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of
release; and
(e) For purposes of this subsection, prior offenses shall include all convictions in
this state, and any other state or jurisdiction, for operating or being in control
Page 4 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or other substances
that impair one's driving ability, or any combination of alcohol and such
substances, or while having an unlawful alcohol concentration, or driving
while intoxicated, but shall not include convictions for violating subsection
(1)(f) of this section. A court shall receive as proof of a prior conviction a
copy of that conviction, certified by the court ordering the conviction.
(6) Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1)(f) of this section shall be
fined no less than one hundred dollars ($100) and no more than five hundred dollars
($500), or sentenced to twenty (20) hours of community service in lieu of a fine. A
person subject to the penalties of this subsection shall not be subject to the penalties
established in subsection (5) of this section or any other penalty established
pursuant to KRS Chapter 189A, except those established in KRS 189A.040(1) and
KRS 189A.070.
(7) If the person is under the age of twenty-one (21) and there was an alcohol
concentration of 0.08 or greater[ based on the definition of alcohol concentration in
KRS 189A.005], the person shall be subject to the penalties established pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section.
(8) (a) For a second or third offense within a ten (10) year period, the minimum
sentence of imprisonment or community labor shall not be suspended,
probated, or subject to conditional discharge or other form of early release.
(b) For a fourth or subsequent offense under this section, the minimum term of
imprisonment shall be one hundred twenty (120) days, and this term shall not
be suspended, probated, or subject to conditional discharge or other form of
early release.
(c) For a second or subsequent offense, at least forty-eight (48) hours of the
mandatory sentence shall be served consecutively.
(9) When sentencing persons under subsection (5)(a) of this section, at least one (1) of
Page 5 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
the penalties shall be assessed and that penalty shall not be suspended, probated, or
subject to conditional discharge or other form of early release.
(10) In determining the ten (10) year period under this section, the period shall be
measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of
conviction were entered.
(11) For purposes of this section, aggravating circumstances are any one (1) or more of
the following:
(a) Operating a motor vehicle in excess of thirty (30) miles per hour above the
speed limit;
(b) Operating a motor vehicle in the wrong direction on a limited access highway;
(c) Operating a motor vehicle that causes an accident resulting in death or serious
physical injury as defined in KRS 500.080;
(d) Operating a motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration in the operator's
blood or breath is 0.15 or more as measured by a test or tests of a sample of
the operator's blood or breath taken within two (2) hours of cessation of
operation of the motor vehicle;
(e) Refusing to submit to any test or tests of one's blood, breath, or urine
requested by an officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person was
operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle in violation of subsection
(1) of this section, except it shall not be considered an aggravating
circumstance for a first offense under subsection (5)(a) of this section;[ and]
(f) Operating a motor vehicle that is transporting a passenger under the age of
twelve (12) years old; and
(g) 1. Operating a motor vehicle while the operator's license is suspended
for a previous violation of this section or KRS 189A.090.
2. For purposes of this paragraph, an operator's license is suspended for
a violation of this section or KRS 189A.090 until the operator has his
Page 6 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
or her privilege to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle reinstated
following a conviction for a violation of this section or KRS 189A.090.
(12) The substances applicable to a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of this section
are:
(a) Any Schedule I controlled substance except marijuana;
(b) Alprazolam;
(c) Amphetamine;
(d) Buprenorphine;
(e) Butalbital;
(f) Carisoprodol;
(g) Clonazepam;
(h) Cocaine;
(i)[(h)] Cyclobenzaprine;
(j) Diazepam;
(k)[(i)] Fentanyl;
(l) Hydrocodone;
(m)[(j)] Meprobamate;
(n)[(k)] Methadone;
(o)[(l)] Methamphetamine;
(p)[(m)] Oxycodone;
(q)[(n)] Promethazine;
(r)[(o)] Propoxyphene; and
(s)[(p)] Zolpidem.
Section 2. KRS 189A.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) 1. Unless the person is under eighteen (18) years of age, in addition to the
penalties specified in KRS 189A.010, the Transportation Cabinet shall
suspend a person's license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle
Page 7 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1).
2. Upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e), the
Transportation Cabinet shall suspend a person's license to operate a
motor vehicle or motorcycle as follows:
a. For the first offense within a ten (10) year period:
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340, six (6) months unless the person commits a
violation described in subsection (4)(b)2.b. of Section 4 of
this Act within the last ninety (90) days of the six (6) month
period, in which case the period of suspension shall
continue until the person meets the ninety (90) consecutive
day requirement; or[ and who meets the ninety (90)
consecutive day requirement within the first four (4) months
of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, four (4)
months;]
ii. [For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license
under KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the ninety (90)
consecutive day requirement within the first four (4) months
of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, until the
person meets the ninety (90) consecutive day requirement or
six (6) months, whichever is shorter; or
iii. ]For all others, nine (9)[six (6)] months;
b. For the second offense within a ten (10) year period:
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340, twelve (12) months unless the person
commits a violation described in subsection (4)(b)2.b. of
Section 4 of this Act within the last one hundred twenty
Page 8 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
(120) days of the twelve (12) month period, in which case
the period of suspension shall continue until the person
meets the one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day
requirement; or[ and who meets the one hundred twenty
(120) consecutive day requirement within the first twelve
(12) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license,
twelve (12) months;]
ii. [For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license
under KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the one hundred
twenty (120) consecutive day requirement within the first
twelve (12) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock
license, until the person meets the one hundred twenty (120)
consecutive day requirement or eighteen (18) months,
whichever is shorter; or
iii. ]For all others, eighteen (18) months;
c. For a third offense within a ten (10) year period:
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340, eighteen (18) months unless the person
commits a violation described in subsection (4)(b)2.b. of
Section 4 of this Act within the last one hundred twenty
(120) days of the eighteen (18) month period, in which case
the period of suspension shall continue until the person
meets the one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day
requirement; or[ and who meets the one hundred twenty
(120) consecutive day requirement within the first eighteen
(18) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license,
eighteen (18) months;]
Page 9 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
ii. [For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license
under KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the one hundred
twenty (120) consecutive day requirement within the first
eighteen (18) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock
license, until the person meets the one hundred twenty (120)
consecutive day requirement or thirty-six (36) months,
whichever is shorter; or
iii. ]For all others, thirty-six (36) months;
d. For a fourth or subsequent offense within a ten (10) year period:
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340, thirty (30) months unless the person
commits a violation described in subsection (4)(b)2.b. of
Section 4 of this Act within the last one hundred twenty
(120) days of the thirty (30) month period, in which case
the period of suspension shall continue until the person
meets the one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day
requirement; or[ and who meets the one hundred twenty
(120) consecutive day requirement within the first thirty (30)
months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, thirty
(30) months;]
ii. [For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license
under KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the one hundred
twenty (120) consecutive day requirement within the first
thirty (30) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock
license, until the person meets the one hundred twenty (120)
consecutive day requirement or sixty (60) months, whichever
is shorter; or
Page 10 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
iii. ]For all others, sixty (60) months;
e. If the conviction records transmitted to the Transportation Cabinet
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section show that a person was
convicted of a:
i. First offense of KRS 189A.010, the person's license shall be
suspended as provided in subdivision a. of this subparagraph;
ii. Second offense of KRS 189A.010, the person's license shall
be suspended as provided in subdivision b. of this
subparagraph;
iii. Third offense of KRS 189A.010, the person's license shall be
suspended as provided in subdivision c. of this subparagraph;
and
iv. Fourth or subsequent offense of KRS 189A.010, the person's
license shall be suspended as provided in subdivision d. of
this subparagraph; and
f. The license suspension shall be deemed effective on the date of
entry of the court's order or judgement for a conviction of KRS
189A.010.
3. Upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1)(f), the Transportation Cabinet
shall suspend a person's license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle
for six (6) months unless the person commits a violation described in
subsection (4)(b)2.b. of Section 4 of this Act within the last ninety (90)
days of the six (6) month period, in which case the period of
suspension shall continue until the person meets the ninety (90)
consecutive day requirement[as follows:
a. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS
189A.340 and who meets the ninety (90) consecutive day
Page 11 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
requirement within the first four (4) months of the issuance of the
ignition interlock license, four (4) months;
b. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS
189A.340 but does not meet the ninety (90) consecutive day
requirement within the first four (4) months of the issuance of the
ignition interlock license, until the person meets the ninety (90)
consecutive day requirement or six (6) months, whichever is
shorter; or
c. For all others, six (6) months].
4. For purposes of this paragraph, "ninety (90) consecutive day
requirement" and "one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day
requirement" mean the requirements established in KRS
189A.340(4)(b)2.
(b) For a person under the age of eighteen (18), in addition to the penalties
specified in KRS 189A.010, the Transportation Cabinet shall suspend the
person's license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle upon conviction of
KRS 189A.010(1). The person shall have his or her license suspended until he
or she reaches the age of eighteen (18) or as provided in paragraph (a) of this
subsection, whichever penalty will result in the longer period of suspension.
(2) In addition to the period of license suspension set forth in subsection (1) of this
section, no person shall be eligible for reinstatement of his or her full privilege to
operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle until he or she has completed the alcohol or
substance abuse education or treatment program ordered pursuant to KRS
189A.040.
(3) Upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1):
(a) A person shall surrender his or her license to operate a motor vehicle or
motorcycle to the court. Should the person fail to surrender his or her license
Page 12 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
to the court, the court shall issue an order directing the sheriff or any other
peace officer to seize the license forthwith and deliver it to the court. The
court shall then forward the license to the Transportation Cabinet. This
paragraph shall not apply to a person who has previously surrendered his or
her license pursuant to KRS 189A.200; and
(b) The court shall immediately transmit the conviction records and other
appropriate information to the Transportation Cabinet. A court shall not waive
or stay this procedure.
(4) In determining the ten (10) year period under this section, the period shall be
measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of
conviction were entered.
(5) Any period of suspension imposed under this section, including a period of
suspension for a person who has been issued an ignition interlock license, and
the consecutive day requirements established in subsection (4)(b)2. of Section 4 of
this Act, shall be tolled while a person is serving a sentence of imprisonment
under Section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. KRS 189A.105 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person's refusal to submit to tests under KRS 189A.103 shall result in suspension
of his or her driving privilege as provided in this chapter.
(2) (a) At the time a breath, blood, or urine test is requested, the person shall be
informed:
1. That, if the person refuses to submit to a breath or urine test[such
tests]:
a. The fact of this refusal may be used against him or her in court as
evidence of violating KRS 189A.010 and will result in suspension
of his or her driver's license by the court at the time of
arraignment; and
Page 13 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
b. If the person is subsequently convicted of violating KRS
189A.010(1):
i. For a second or third time within a ten (10) year period, he or
she will be subject to a mandatory minimum jail sentence
which is twice as long as the mandatory minimum jail
sentence imposed if he or she submits to the tests; and
ii. His or her license will be suspended by the Transportation
Cabinet;
2. That, if the person refuses to submit to a blood test:
a. The fact of this refusal will result in suspension of his or her
driver's license by the court at the time of arraignment; and
b. If the person is subsequently convicted of violation subsection (1)
of Section 1 of this Act, his or her license will be suspended by
the Transportation Cabinet:
3. That, if a test is taken:
a. The results of the test may be used against the person in court as
evidence of violating KRS 189A.010(1); and
b. The person has the right to have a test or tests of his or her blood
performed by a person of his or her choosing described in KRS
189A.103 within a reasonable time of his or her arrest at the
expense of the person arrested; and
4.[3.] That although his or her license will be suspended, he or she may be
eligible immediately for an ignition interlock license allowing him or
her to drive during the period of suspension and, if he or she is
convicted, he or she will receive a credit toward any other ignition
interlock requirement arising from this arrest.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit a judge of a court of
Page 14 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
competent jurisdiction from issuing a search warrant or other court order
requiring a blood or urine test, or a combination thereof, of a defendant
charged with a violation of KRS 189A.010, or other statutory violation arising
from the incident. However, if the incident involves a motor vehicle accident
in which there was a fatality, the investigating peace officer shall seek such a
search warrant for blood testing unless the testing has already been done by
consent. If testing done pursuant to a warrant reveals the presence of alcohol
or any other substance that impaired the driving ability of a person who is
charged and convicted of a violation of KRS 189A.010(1), the sentencing
court shall require, in addition to any other sentencing provision, that the
defendant make restitution to the state for the cost of the testing.
(c) 1. When directed by a peace officer pursuant to a search warrant or other
court order issued under this subsection, a qualified medical professional
shall withdraw the sample of blood as soon as practicable and shall
deliver the sample to the requesting peace officer, or other peace officer
as directed by the requesting peace officer, provided that the collection
of the sample does not jeopardize the person's life, cause serious injury
to the person, or seriously impede the person's medical assessment, care,
or treatment.
2. The qualified medical professional authorized to withdraw the blood
sample and the medical care facility where the blood sample is drawn
shall be considered as acting in good faith once presented with a search
warrant or other court order issued under this subsection. The qualified
medical professional shall not require the person that is the subject of
the test or tests to provide any additional consent.
3. A qualified medical professional who administers any test under this
paragraph upon the request of a peace officer, and a medical care facility
Page 15 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
where any test under this paragraph may be performed, shall not be
criminally liable solely for administering the requested test or civilly
liable for damages to the person tested solely for administering the
requested test except in cases of gross negligence or willful or wanton
misconduct.
(3) During the period immediately preceding the administration of any test, the person
shall be afforded an opportunity of at least ten (10) minutes but not more than
fifteen (15) minutes to attempt to contact and communicate with an attorney and
shall be informed of this right. Inability to communicate with an attorney during
this period shall not be deemed to relieve the person of his or her obligation to
submit to the tests and the penalties specified by KRS 189A.010 and 189A.107
shall remain applicable to the person upon refusal. Nothing in this section shall be
deemed to create a right to have an attorney present during the administration of the
tests, but the person's attorney may be present if the attorney can physically appear
at the location where the test is to be administered within the time period
established in this section.
(4) Immediately following the administration of the final test requested by the officer,
the person shall again be informed of his or her right to have a test or tests of his or
her blood performed by a person of his or her choosing described in KRS 189A.103
within a reasonable time of his or her arrest at the expense of the person arrested.
He or she shall then be asked "Do you want such a test?" The officer shall make
reasonable efforts to provide transportation to the tests.
Section 4. KRS 189A.340 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) If a person's license is suspended pursuant to this chapter and the initial
suspension was for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (e), or (f), the sole
license the person shall be eligible for is an ignition interlock license pursuant
to this section.
Page 16 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
(b) If a person's license is suspended pursuant to this chapter and the initial
suspension was for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(c) or (d), the person shall
be eligible for an ignition interlock license pursuant to this section and may be
eligible for a hardship license pursuant to KRS 189A.410.
(2) (a) A person may apply for an ignition interlock license anytime, including after
receiving the notices under KRS 189A.105 or after his or her license has been
suspended pursuant to this chapter.
(b) If at the time the person applies for an ignition interlock license, the person's
license has been suspended pursuant to this chapter, the person shall be
authorized to drive to:
1. An ignition interlock device provider to have a functioning ignition
interlock device installed in his or her motor vehicle or motorcycle; and
2. The Transportation Cabinet to obtain an ignition interlock license;
This paragraph shall only apply within fourteen (14) days of the date printed
on the ignition interlock approval letter issued by the Transportation Cabinet
and if the person has the ignition interlock approval letter in the motor vehicle
or motorcycle.
(3) Before the Transportation Cabinet shall issue an ignition interlock license, the
person shall:
(a) Submit an application for an ignition interlock license;
(b) Provide proof of motor vehicle insurance;
(c) Provide an ignition interlock certificate of installation issued by an ignition
interlock device provider; and
(d) Provide any other information required by administrative regulations
promulgated by the Transportation Cabinet under KRS 189A.350.
(4) An ignition interlock license shall restrict the person to operating only a motor
vehicle or motorcycle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device, unless
Page 17 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
the person qualifies for an employer exemption under subsection (6) of this section.
This restriction shall remain in place for:
(a) If a person's license was suspended pretrial pursuant to KRS 189A.200, the
required suspension period under KRS 189A.200(6);
(b) If a person's license was suspended pursuant to KRS 189A.070 or 189A.107:
1. The required suspension period under KRS 189A.070(1); and
2. a. If the maximum suspension period under KRS 189A.070(1)(a) has
not yet been met, until the Transportation Cabinet has received a
declaration from the person's ignition interlock device provider, in
a form provided or approved by the cabinet, certifying that none of
the violations outlined in subdivision b. of this subparagraph has
occurred:
i. For a first offense within a ten (10) year period of KRS
189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) or for any offense of KRS
189A.010(1)(f), in the ninety (90) consecutive days; and
ii. For all subsequent offenses within a ten (10) year period of
KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e), one hundred twenty
(120) consecutive days;
prior to the date of releasing the ignition interlock device
restriction.
b. If any of the following occur, it shall be a violation of the ninety
(90) or one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement:
i. Failure to take any random breath alcohol concentration test
unless a review of the digital image confirms that the motor
vehicle or motorcycle was not occupied by a driver at the
time of the missed test;
ii. Failure to pass any random retest with a breath alcohol
Page 18 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
concentration of 0.02 or lower unless a subsequent test
performed within ten (10) minutes registers a breath alcohol
concentration lower than 0.02, and the digital image
confirms the same person provided both samples;
iii. Failure of the person, or his or her designee, to appear at the
ignition interlock device provider when required for
maintenance, repair, calibration, monitoring, inspection, or
replacement of the device;
iv. Failure of the person to pay fees established pursuant to
subsection (7) of this section;
v. Tampering with an installed ignition interlock device with
the intent of rendering it defective; or
vi. Altering, concealing, hiding, or attempting to alter, conceal,
or hide, the person's identity from the ignition interlock
device's camera while providing a breath sample;
(c) If a person's license was suspended pursuant to KRS 189A.090, for the
required suspension period under KRS 189A.090(2); or
(d) If a person's license suspension was extended pursuant to KRS 189A.345, the
required suspension period under KRS 189A.345(1).
(5) (a) The time period a person:
1. Holds a valid ignition interlock license pursuant to this section; or
2. Receives alcohol or substance abuse treatment in an inpatient residential
facility;
shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the suspension periods
detailed in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the Transportation
Cabinet shall give the person a day-for-day credit for any time period the
Page 19 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
person:
1. Held a valid ignition interlock license; or
2. Received alcohol or substance abuse treatment in an inpatient residential
facility.
(c) A person shall not receive day-for-day credit for days the person utilized the
employer exemption in accordance with subsection (6) of this section and
drove an employer's motor vehicle or motorcycle not equipped with a
functioning ignition interlock device.
(6) (a) A person with an ignition interlock license may operate a motor vehicle or
motorcycle not equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device if:
1. The person is required to operate an employer's motor vehicle or
motorcycle in the course and scope of employment; and
2. The business entity that owns the motor vehicle or motorcycle is not
owned or controlled by the person.
(b) To qualify for the employer exemption, the person shall provide the
Transportation Cabinet with a sworn statement from his or her employer
stating that the person and business entity meet the requirements of paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(7) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, an ignition interlock
device provider may charge the following fees:
1. An installation fee for:
a. An alternative fuel vehicle or a vehicle with a push button starter
not to exceed one hundred thirty dollars ($130);[,]
b. An electric or hybrid vehicle, or a vehicle that requires an
otherwise complex installation, not to exceed three hundred
dollars ($300); or
c. [An installation fee for ]All other vehicles not to exceed one
Page 20 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
hundred dollars ($100);
2. A monthly fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100);
3. A removal fee not to exceed thirty dollars ($30);
4. A reset fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50); or
5. A missed appointment fee not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35).
(b) A person who is issued an ignition interlock license shall pay fees as
established in his or her lease agreement with the ignition interlock device
provider for any ignition interlock device installed in his or her motor vehicle
or motorcycle. However, the fees shall never be more than allowed under
paragraph (a) of this subsection and are subject to paragraph (c) of this
subsection.
(c) Any person who has an income:
1. At or below two hundred percent (200%) but above one hundred fifty
percent (150%) of the federal poverty guidelines, shall pay only
seventy-five percent (75%) of fees established pursuant to paragraph (a)
of this subsection;
2. At or below one hundred fifty percent (150%) but above one hundred
percent (100%) of the federal poverty guidelines, shall pay only fifty
percent (50%) of fees established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection; or
3. At or below one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty
guidelines, shall pay only twenty-five percent (25%) of fees established
pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection;
As used in this paragraph, "federal poverty guidelines" has the same meaning
as in KRS 205.5621. The Transportation Cabinet shall determine the person's
income and where that income places the person on the federal poverty
guidelines.
Page 21 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 456/GA
(d) Neither the Commonwealth, the Transportation Cabinet, nor any unit of state
or local government shall be responsible for payment of any costs associated
with an ignition interlock device.
(8) For a person issued an ignition interlock license under this section who is residing
outside of Kentucky, the Transportation Cabinet may accept an ignition interlock
certificate of installation from an ignition interlock device provider authorized to do
business in the state where the person resides if the ignition interlock device meets
the requirements of that state.
Page 22 of 22
HB045610.100 - 444 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:41 PM GA